Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.725

Home tuition programs.

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may establish home tuition programs by negotiating home tuition agreements with an out-of-state institution or consortium of institutions of higher education if no loss of tuition and fee revenue occurs as a result of the agreements.

(2) Home tuition agreements allow students at Washington state institutions of higher education to attend an out-of-state institution of higher education as part of a student exchange. Students participating in a home tuition program shall pay an amount equal to their regular, full-time tuition and required fees to either the Washington institution of higher education or the out-of-state institution of higher education depending upon the provisions of the particular agreement. Payment of course fees in excess of generally applicable tuition and required fees must be addressed in each home tuition agreement to ensure that the instructional programs of the Washington institution of higher education do not incur additional uncompensated costs as a result of the exchange.

(3) Student participation in a home tuition agreement authorized by this section is limited to one academic year.

(4) Students enrolled under a home tuition agreement shall reside in Washington state for the duration of the program, may not use the year of enrollment under this program to establish Washington state residency, and are not eligible for state financial aid.

[ 1997 c 433 s 4; 1994 c 234 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 26; 1992 c 231 s 24; 1989 c 290 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1997 c 433: "It is the intent of the legislature to provide for diverse educational opportunities at the state's institutions of higher education and to facilitate student participation in educational exchanges with institutions outside the state of Washington. To accomplish this, this act establishes a home tuition program allowing students at Washington state institutions of higher education to take advantage of out-of-state and international educational opportunities while paying an amount equal to their regularly charged tuition and required fees." [ 1997 c 433 s 1.]

Severability—1997 c 433: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 433 s 6.]

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Intent—1989 c 290; 1994 c 234: "The legislature recognizes that a unique educational experience can result from an undergraduate student attending an out-of-state institution. It also recognizes that some Washington residents may be unable to pursue such out-of-state enrollment owing to their limited financial resources and the higher cost of nonresident tuition. The legislature intends to facilitate expanded nonresident undergraduate enrollment opportunities for residents of the state by authorizing the governing boards of the four-year institutions of higher education to enter into exchange programs with other states' institutions with comparable programs wherein the participating institutions agree that visiting undergraduate students will pay resident tuition rates of the host institutions." [ 1994 c 234 s 2; 1989 c 290 s 1.]